Massachusetts, session 194th, H2037.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1 . Section 19 of chapter 62C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
The commission shall grant a reasonable extension of time for filing any return required
by this chapter for a person if within the 12 months preceding the filing deadline a court, law
enforcement officer or agency or the department of children and families determines that the
person or their minor child has suffered abuse, as defined in section 1 of chapter 209A, from a
family or household member, as defined in said section 1 of said chapter 209A, with whom they
file a joint tax return pursuant to section 6.
SECTION 2 . Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10Q the following section:-
of 4

Section 10R. Notwithstanding section 9A or any general or special law to the contrary,
the division shall, subject to appropriation and regardless of their income or asset level, offer
MassHealth coverage for a period of up to 12 months to a person and any minor children in the
person’s custody if a court, law enforcement officer or agency or the department of children and
families determines that the person or their minor child has suffered abuse, as defined in section
1 of chapter 209A, from a family or household member, as defined in said section 1 of said
chapter 209A, with whom they share health insurance coverage.
SECTION 3 . Section 51A of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (k) and inserting in place thereof
the following subsection:-
(k) A mandated reporter who is professionally licensed by the commonwealth shall
complete training at least once every 2 years to recognize and report suspected child abuse or
neglect. The executive office of health and human services, in consultation with the department
and the office of the child advocate, shall develop an evidenced-based training curriculum and
program for mandated reporters and promulgate regulations to implement the training program.
SECTION 4. Paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of section 2 of chapter 175M of the General
Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out in line 8 the word “or”.
SECTION 5 . Said paragraph (1) of said subsection (a) of said section 2 of said chapter
175M is hereby further amended by adding the following words:- ; or (iv) in order to care for
themselves or their minor child following a determination by a court, law enforcement officer or
agency or the department of children and families that the individual or their minor child has
of 4

suffered abuse, as defined in section 1 of chapter 209A, from a family or household member, as
defined in said section 1 of said chapter 209A.
SECTION 6 . Clause (d) of the first paragraph of section 3 of chapter 209A of the
General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 18 through 29,
inclusive, the words “(d) awarding the plaintiff temporary custody of a minor child; provided,
however, that in any case brought in the probate and family court a finding by such court by a
preponderance of the evidence that a pattern or serious incident of abuse, as defined in section
31A of chapter 208, toward a parent or child has occurred shall create a rebuttable presumption
that it is not in the best interests of the child to be placed in sole custody, shared legal custody or
shared physical custody with the abusive parent. Such presumption may be rebutted by a
preponderance of the evidence that such custody award is in the best interests of the child. For
the purposes of this section, an “abusive parent” shall mean a parent who has committed a
pattern of abuse or a serious incident of abuse;” and inserting in place thereof the following
words:-
(d) awarding the plaintiff temporary custody of a minor child; provided, however, that
in any case brought in the probate and family court a finding by such court by a preponderance
of the evidence that a pattern or serious incident of abuse, as defined in section 31A of chapter
208, toward a parent or child has occurred shall create a rebuttable presumption that it is not in
the best interests of the child to be placed in sole custody, shared legal custody or shared physical
custody with the abusive parent, and such presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of
the evidence that such custody award is in the best interests of the child; and provided further,
that if the probate and family court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a pattern or
serious incident of abuse toward a minor child has occurred, such court shall not place the child
of 4

against whom the abuse was perpetrated in sole custody, shared legal custody or shared physical
custody with the abusive parent.. For the purposes of this section, an “abusive parent” shall mean
a parent who has committed a pattern of abuse or a serious incident of abuse.;
SECTION 7 . Section 12 of chapter 210 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following paragraph:-
Where a petition is filed on behalf of a minor child and a court or the department of
children and families has determined that the child has suffered abuse, as defined in section 1 of
chapter 209A, from a family or household member, as defined in said section 1 of said chapter
209A, with whom the child shares a surname, the petition shall be considered consistent with the
public interests.
of 4